Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6566XS (1) 91 jda/jh S.F. 2176 Section 1. Section 261E.8, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 10. If a student fails a community 3 college-offered class, or a class taught by a community 4 college-employed instructor, the studentâs parent or guardian, 5 if the student is a minor, or the student, if the student is 6 eighteen years of age or older or is an emancipated minor, 7 shall, upon the request of the school district or accredited 8 nonpublic school through which the student is accessing the 9 program, pay to the school district or accredited nonpublic 10 school an amount equal to the amount the school district or 11 accredited nonpublic school paid to the community college 12 pursuant to the contract entered into under this section that 13 is directly associated with the studentâs participation in 14 the community college-offered class or the class taught by a 15 community college-employed instructor. 16